Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,112
Hospital authority; rights and remedies; cumulative.

All the rights and remedies conferred in sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 shall be cumulative and shall be subject to sale by the foreclosure of a trust indenture, or any other instrument thereon, or relating to any contract with the authority.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.112.